North Carolina statutes. Chapter 145. State Symbols and Other Official Adoptions.
§ 145-42.
State frog.

The pine barrens tree frog (Hyla andersonii) is adopted as the official frog of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2013-189, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-189, in its preamble, provides: “Whereas, some of North Carolina’s official State symbols have been suggested by the State’s school children after they have had history, science, social studies, or geography lessons related to North Carolina; and

“Whereas, this year some of the suggestions range from the adoption of an official fossil to an official frog; and

“Whereas, the State of North Carolina has a number of unique official symbols but does not have an official fossil, frog, salamander, marsupial, folk art, or art medium; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark is an extinct shark species that lived over 1.5 million years ago; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark may have reached over 40 feet in length and weighed up to 100 tons; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark had serrated, heart-shaped teeth that may have grown to over seven inches in length; and

“Whereas, fossilized teeth of the megalodon shark have been found in North Carolina and throughout the world; and

“Whereas, North Carolina and the Southeast region of the United States lead the world in amphibian diversity; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog can be found in the Sandhills and Coastal Plain regions of North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog has been considered one of the most striking and beautiful frogs in the Southeast region of the United States; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog by name reflects one of North Carolina’s signature trees and ecosystems that have been a vital part of the State’s economic, cultural, and natural history since colonial times; and

“Whereas, North Carolina also leads the nation and world in salamander diversity, most notably in our Appalachian Mountains; and

“Whereas, the marbled salamander is found throughout the State and is unique in that it is a charismatic, striking, chunky-bodied, fossorial amphibian, of which no two are exactly alike in color pattern; and

“Whereas, according the North Carolina Wildlife Commission’s 2005 North Carolina Wildlife Action Plan, the pine barrens tree frog and the marbled salamander have been identified as priority species for population monitoring and conservation in North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is native to North Carolina and is the only marsupial found in North America; the female carries its underdeveloped young in a pouch until they are capable of living independently, similar to a kangaroo; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is one of the oldest and most primitive species of mammal found in North America; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is about the size of a large house cat with a triangular head; a long pointed nose; dark eyes; a long, scaly, prehensile tail; and short, black, leathery ears; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is nocturnal and lives in a wide variety of habitats, including deciduous forests, open woods, and farmland but prefers wet areas such as marshes, swamps, and streams; and

“Whereas, at age 65, Vollis Simpson, a self-taught folk artist, began making giant windmills known as ‘whirligigs’ at his home in Wilson, North Carolina; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson’s whirligigs have been exhibited at the North Carolina Museum of Art in Raleigh, the High Museum of Art in Atlanta, Georgia, and the Visionary Art Museum in Baltimore, Maryland, and at other locations, including New York, California, Canada, and England; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson and details of his artwork have been featured in many national magazines and in several books; and

“Whereas, the City of Wilson is developing the Vollis Simpson Whirligig Park to display a large collection of these whirligigs in historic downtown, which will be a one-of-a-kind destination for visitors; and

“Whereas, North Carolina’s clay-rich soil has contributed to the State’s pottery heritage; and

“Whereas, the use of clay has grown from the State’s early Native Americans making mostly utilitarian wares and European settlers continuing the traditions of their ancestors to today’s potters designing pottery with utilitarian and aesthetic elements; and

“Whereas, the pottery tradition continues to thrive in North Carolina, especially in the Seagrove area, which includes parts of Chatham, Lee, Moore, Montgomery, and Randolph Counties; and

“Whereas, clay continues to be an important art medium contributing to the State’s cultural, social, and economic prosperity; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-43.
State salamander.

The marbled salamander (Ambystoma opacum) is adopted as the official salamander of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2013-189, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-189, in its preamble, provides: “Whereas, some of North Carolina’s official State symbols have been suggested by the State’s school children after they have had history, science, social studies, or geography lessons related to North Carolina; and

“Whereas, this year some of the suggestions range from the adoption of an official fossil to an official frog; and

“Whereas, the State of North Carolina has a number of unique official symbols but does not have an official fossil, frog, salamander, marsupial, folk art, or art medium; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark is an extinct shark species that lived over 1.5 million years ago; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark may have reached over 40 feet in length and weighed up to 100 tons; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark had serrated, heart-shaped teeth that may have grown to over seven inches in length; and

“Whereas, fossilized teeth of the megalodon shark have been found in North Carolina and throughout the world; and

“Whereas, North Carolina and the Southeast region of the United States lead the world in amphibian diversity; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog can be found in the Sandhills and Coastal Plain regions of North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog has been considered one of the most striking and beautiful frogs in the Southeast region of the United States; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog by name reflects one of North Carolina’s signature trees and ecosystems that have been a vital part of the State’s economic, cultural, and natural history since colonial times; and

“Whereas, North Carolina also leads the nation and world in salamander diversity, most notably in our Appalachian Mountains; and

“Whereas, the marbled salamander is found throughout the State and is unique in that it is a charismatic, striking, chunky-bodied, fossorial amphibian, of which no two are exactly alike in color pattern; and

“Whereas, according the North Carolina Wildlife Commission’s 2005 North Carolina Wildlife Action Plan, the pine barrens tree frog and the marbled salamander have been identified as priority species for population monitoring and conservation in North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is native to North Carolina and is the only marsupial found in North America; the female carries its underdeveloped young in a pouch until they are capable of living independently, similar to a kangaroo; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is one of the oldest and most primitive species of mammal found in North America; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is about the size of a large house cat with a triangular head; a long pointed nose; dark eyes; a long, scaly, prehensile tail; and short, black, leathery ears; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is nocturnal and lives in a wide variety of habitats, including deciduous forests, open woods, and farmland but prefers wet areas such as marshes, swamps, and streams; and

“Whereas, at age 65, Vollis Simpson, a self-taught folk artist, began making giant windmills known as ‘whirligigs’ at his home in Wilson, North Carolina; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson’s whirligigs have been exhibited at the North Carolina Museum of Art in Raleigh, the High Museum of Art in Atlanta, Georgia, and the Visionary Art Museum in Baltimore, Maryland, and at other locations, including New York, California, Canada, and England; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson and details of his artwork have been featured in many national magazines and in several books; and

“Whereas, the City of Wilson is developing the Vollis Simpson Whirligig Park to display a large collection of these whirligigs in historic downtown, which will be a one-of-a-kind destination for visitors; and

“Whereas, North Carolina’s clay-rich soil has contributed to the State’s pottery heritage; and

“Whereas, the use of clay has grown from the State’s early Native Americans making mostly utilitarian wares and European settlers continuing the traditions of their ancestors to today’s potters designing pottery with utilitarian and aesthetic elements; and

“Whereas, the pottery tradition continues to thrive in North Carolina, especially in the Seagrove area, which includes parts of Chatham, Lee, Moore, Montgomery, and Randolph Counties; and

“Whereas, clay continues to be an important art medium contributing to the State’s cultural, social, and economic prosperity; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-44.
State marsupial.

The Virginia opossum (Didelphis virginiana) is adopted as the official marsupial of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2013-189, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-189, in its preamble, provides: “Whereas, some of North Carolina’s official State symbols have been suggested by the State’s school children after they have had history, science, social studies, or geography lessons related to North Carolina; and

“Whereas, this year some of the suggestions range from the adoption of an official fossil to an official frog; and

“Whereas, the State of North Carolina has a number of unique official symbols but does not have an official fossil, frog, salamander, marsupial, folk art, or art medium; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark is an extinct shark species that lived over 1.5 million years ago; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark may have reached over 40 feet in length and weighed up to 100 tons; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark had serrated, heart-shaped teeth that may have grown to over seven inches in length; and

“Whereas, fossilized teeth of the megalodon shark have been found in North Carolina and throughout the world; and

“Whereas, North Carolina and the Southeast region of the United States lead the world in amphibian diversity; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog can be found in the Sandhills and Coastal Plain regions of North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog has been considered one of the most striking and beautiful frogs in the Southeast region of the United States; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog by name reflects one of North Carolina’s signature trees and ecosystems that have been a vital part of the State’s economic, cultural, and natural history since colonial times; and

“Whereas, North Carolina also leads the nation and world in salamander diversity, most notably in our Appalachian Mountains; and

“Whereas, the marbled salamander is found throughout the State and is unique in that it is a charismatic, striking, chunky-bodied, fossorial amphibian, of which no two are exactly alike in color pattern; and

“Whereas, according the North Carolina Wildlife Commission’s 2005 North Carolina Wildlife Action Plan, the pine barrens tree frog and the marbled salamander have been identified as priority species for population monitoring and conservation in North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is native to North Carolina and is the only marsupial found in North America; the female carries its underdeveloped young in a pouch until they are capable of living independently, similar to a kangaroo; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is one of the oldest and most primitive species of mammal found in North America; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is about the size of a large house cat with a triangular head; a long pointed nose; dark eyes; a long, scaly, prehensile tail; and short, black, leathery ears; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is nocturnal and lives in a wide variety of habitats, including deciduous forests, open woods, and farmland but prefers wet areas such as marshes, swamps, and streams; and

“Whereas, at age 65, Vollis Simpson, a self-taught folk artist, began making giant windmills known as ‘whirligigs’ at his home in Wilson, North Carolina; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson’s whirligigs have been exhibited at the North Carolina Museum of Art in Raleigh, the High Museum of Art in Atlanta, Georgia, and the Visionary Art Museum in Baltimore, Maryland, and at other locations, including New York, California, Canada, and England; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson and details of his artwork have been featured in many national magazines and in several books; and

“Whereas, the City of Wilson is developing the Vollis Simpson Whirligig Park to display a large collection of these whirligigs in historic downtown, which will be a one-of-a-kind destination for visitors; and

“Whereas, North Carolina’s clay-rich soil has contributed to the State’s pottery heritage; and

“Whereas, the use of clay has grown from the State’s early Native Americans making mostly utilitarian wares and European settlers continuing the traditions of their ancestors to today’s potters designing pottery with utilitarian and aesthetic elements; and

“Whereas, the pottery tradition continues to thrive in North Carolina, especially in the Seagrove area, which includes parts of Chatham, Lee, Moore, Montgomery, and Randolph Counties; and

“Whereas, clay continues to be an important art medium contributing to the State’s cultural, social, and economic prosperity; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-45.
State folk art.

The whirligigs created by Vollis Simpson are adopted as the official folk art of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2013-189, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-189, in its preamble, provides: “Whereas, some of North Carolina’s official State symbols have been suggested by the State’s school children after they have had history, science, social studies, or geography lessons related to North Carolina; and

“Whereas, this year some of the suggestions range from the adoption of an official fossil to an official frog; and

“Whereas, the State of North Carolina has a number of unique official symbols but does not have an official fossil, frog, salamander, marsupial, folk art, or art medium; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark is an extinct shark species that lived over 1.5 million years ago; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark may have reached over 40 feet in length and weighed up to 100 tons; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark had serrated, heart-shaped teeth that may have grown to over seven inches in length; and

“Whereas, fossilized teeth of the megalodon shark have been found in North Carolina and throughout the world; and

“Whereas, North Carolina and the Southeast region of the United States lead the world in amphibian diversity; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog can be found in the Sandhills and Coastal Plain regions of North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog has been considered one of the most striking and beautiful frogs in the Southeast region of the United States; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog by name reflects one of North Carolina’s signature trees and ecosystems that have been a vital part of the State’s economic, cultural, and natural history since colonial times; and

“Whereas, North Carolina also leads the nation and world in salamander diversity, most notably in our Appalachian Mountains; and

“Whereas, the marbled salamander is found throughout the State and is unique in that it is a charismatic, striking, chunky-bodied, fossorial amphibian, of which no two are exactly alike in color pattern; and

“Whereas, according the North Carolina Wildlife Commission’s 2005 North Carolina Wildlife Action Plan, the pine barrens tree frog and the marbled salamander have been identified as priority species for population monitoring and conservation in North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is native to North Carolina and is the only marsupial found in North America; the female carries its underdeveloped young in a pouch until they are capable of living independently, similar to a kangaroo; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is one of the oldest and most primitive species of mammal found in North America; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is about the size of a large house cat with a triangular head; a long pointed nose; dark eyes; a long, scaly, prehensile tail; and short, black, leathery ears; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is nocturnal and lives in a wide variety of habitats, including deciduous forests, open woods, and farmland but prefers wet areas such as marshes, swamps, and streams; and

“Whereas, at age 65, Vollis Simpson, a self-taught folk artist, began making giant windmills known as ‘whirligigs’ at his home in Wilson, North Carolina; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson’s whirligigs have been exhibited at the North Carolina Museum of Art in Raleigh, the High Museum of Art in Atlanta, Georgia, and the Visionary Art Museum in Baltimore, Maryland, and at other locations, including New York, California, Canada, and England; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson and details of his artwork have been featured in many national magazines and in several books; and

“Whereas, the City of Wilson is developing the Vollis Simpson Whirligig Park to display a large collection of these whirligigs in historic downtown, which will be a one-of-a-kind destination for visitors; and

“Whereas, North Carolina’s clay-rich soil has contributed to the State’s pottery heritage; and

“Whereas, the use of clay has grown from the State’s early Native Americans making mostly utilitarian wares and European settlers continuing the traditions of their ancestors to today’s potters designing pottery with utilitarian and aesthetic elements; and

“Whereas, the pottery tradition continues to thrive in North Carolina, especially in the Seagrove area, which includes parts of Chatham, Lee, Moore, Montgomery, and Randolph Counties; and

“Whereas, clay continues to be an important art medium contributing to the State’s cultural, social, and economic prosperity; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-46.
State art medium.

Clay is adopted as the official art medium of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2013-189, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-189, in its preamble, provides: “Whereas, some of North Carolina’s official State symbols have been suggested by the State’s school children after they have had history, science, social studies, or geography lessons related to North Carolina; and

“Whereas, this year some of the suggestions range from the adoption of an official fossil to an official frog; and

“Whereas, the State of North Carolina has a number of unique official symbols but does not have an official fossil, frog, salamander, marsupial, folk art, or art medium; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark is an extinct shark species that lived over 1.5 million years ago; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark may have reached over 40 feet in length and weighed up to 100 tons; and

“Whereas, the megalodon shark had serrated, heart-shaped teeth that may have grown to over seven inches in length; and

“Whereas, fossilized teeth of the megalodon shark have been found in North Carolina and throughout the world; and

“Whereas, North Carolina and the Southeast region of the United States lead the world in amphibian diversity; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog can be found in the Sandhills and Coastal Plain regions of North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog has been considered one of the most striking and beautiful frogs in the Southeast region of the United States; and

“Whereas, the pine barrens tree frog by name reflects one of North Carolina’s signature trees and ecosystems that have been a vital part of the State’s economic, cultural, and natural history since colonial times; and

“Whereas, North Carolina also leads the nation and world in salamander diversity, most notably in our Appalachian Mountains; and

“Whereas, the marbled salamander is found throughout the State and is unique in that it is a charismatic, striking, chunky-bodied, fossorial amphibian, of which no two are exactly alike in color pattern; and

“Whereas, according the North Carolina Wildlife Commission’s 2005 North Carolina Wildlife Action Plan, the pine barrens tree frog and the marbled salamander have been identified as priority species for population monitoring and conservation in North Carolina; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is native to North Carolina and is the only marsupial found in North America; the female carries its underdeveloped young in a pouch until they are capable of living independently, similar to a kangaroo; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is one of the oldest and most primitive species of mammal found in North America; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is about the size of a large house cat with a triangular head; a long pointed nose; dark eyes; a long, scaly, prehensile tail; and short, black, leathery ears; and

“Whereas, the Virginia opossum is nocturnal and lives in a wide variety of habitats, including deciduous forests, open woods, and farmland but prefers wet areas such as marshes, swamps, and streams; and

“Whereas, at age 65, Vollis Simpson, a self-taught folk artist, began making giant windmills known as ‘whirligigs’ at his home in Wilson, North Carolina; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson’s whirligigs have been exhibited at the North Carolina Museum of Art in Raleigh, the High Museum of Art in Atlanta, Georgia, and the Visionary Art Museum in Baltimore, Maryland, and at other locations, including New York, California, Canada, and England; and

“Whereas, Mr. Simpson and details of his artwork have been featured in many national magazines and in several books; and

“Whereas, the City of Wilson is developing the Vollis Simpson Whirligig Park to display a large collection of these whirligigs in historic downtown, which will be a one-of-a-kind destination for visitors; and

“Whereas, North Carolina’s clay-rich soil has contributed to the State’s pottery heritage; and

“Whereas, the use of clay has grown from the State’s early Native Americans making mostly utilitarian wares and European settlers continuing the traditions of their ancestors to today’s potters designing pottery with utilitarian and aesthetic elements; and

“Whereas, the pottery tradition continues to thrive in North Carolina, especially in the Seagrove area, which includes parts of Chatham, Lee, Moore, Montgomery, and Randolph Counties; and

“Whereas, clay continues to be an important art medium contributing to the State’s cultural, social, and economic prosperity; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-47.
State peanut festival.

The Dublin Peanut Festival, held the third Saturday of September of every year, is adopted as the official peanut festival of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2013-313, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session 2013-313, in its preamble, provides: “Whereas, Dublin, North Carolina, is the official home of the Dublin Peanut Festival; and

“Whereas, the community of Dublin has celebrated the Dublin Peanut Festival on the third Saturday in September for over 20 years; and

“Whereas, the community festival began on September 18, 1993, as a way to help build a gymnasium ultipurpose building for the community and the Dublin Elementary School; and

“Whereas, the goal of the festival is to make the community and local schools stronger; and

“Whereas, the Dublin Peanut Festival provides family-oriented activities, such as a pageant, parade, games, entertainment, food vendors, craft shows, and firemen’s competition; and

“Whereas, it is estimated that the Dublin Peanut Festival brings in over 2,000 visitors annually; and

“Whereas, staging of the festival could not be accomplished without the support of the Dublin Peanut Festival Committee, Committee Chair, volunteers, local businesses, Dublin’s governmental officials, and the community; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-48.
Official Veterans Day Parade.

The Veterans Day Parade held in the Town of Warsaw is adopted as the official Veterans Day Parade in the State of North Carolina.

History.

2016-33, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2016-33, provides in its preamble: “Whereas, the State of North Carolina is proud to host every branch of military service, including Fort Bragg, the largest Army installation in the world, Camp Lejeune, the largest Marine amphibious base in the world, and Seymour Johnson Air Force Base, home of the 4th Fighter Wing of the Air Combat Command; and

“Whereas, North Carolina has over 775,000 veterans living in the State, ranking eighth in the nation, and more than 92,500 military retirees living in the State, ranking sixth in the nation; and

“Whereas, Duplin County is located in the middle of the major military installations in North Carolina, and throughout its history has provided leaders for America’s military and veterans organizations, the most recent being General Dan K. McNeill, a native of Warsaw, and former commander of the NATO International Security Assistance Force in Afghanistan; and

“Whereas, the citizens of Warsaw have always been in the forefront when it was necessary to send young men and women to serve in times of war, and several of the Town’s finest and brightest young men have given their lives for our country, including five who died during the Vietnam War:

“Litchfield Patterson Huey, US Army, killed on February 27, 1967,

“William Irvin (Guy) Turner, Jr., US Army, killed on July 8, 1968,
Charles Grey Costin, US Army, killed on November 1, 1968,
Clarence Leon (Boone) McNeil, US Air Force, killed on February 5, 1969, and
Allen Lewis Boney, US Army, killed on May 14, 1970; and
Whereas, the Town of Warsaw began sponsoring an annual Veterans Day Parade in 1921 to recognize America’s military history and heritage and to honor all of America’s military veterans, living and deceased; and Whereas, the annual Warsaw Veterans Day Parade now is the oldest, continuously held Veterans Day Parade in the United States and should be recognized as the official State Veterans Day Parade; Now, therefore,

“William Irvin (Guy) Turner, Jr., US Army, killed on July 8, 1968,

“Charles Grey Costin, US Army, killed on November 1, 1968,

“Clarence Leon (Boone) McNeil, US Air Force, killed on February 5, 1969, and

“Allen Lewis Boney, US Army, killed on May 14, 1970; and

“Whereas, the Town of Warsaw began sponsoring an annual Veterans Day Parade in 1921 to recognize America’s military history and heritage and to honor all of America’s military veterans, living and deceased; and

“Whereas, the annual Warsaw Veterans Day Parade now is the oldest, continuously held Veterans Day Parade in the United States and should be recognized as the official State Veterans Day Parade; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-49.
State Fly Fishing Museum.

Swain County is designated as the home of the Fly Fishing Museum of the Southern Appalachians, which is located in Bryson City in the heart of the Great Smoky Mountains.

History.

2018-11, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2018-11, s. 3, made this section effective June 15, 2018.

Session Laws 2018-11, in its preamble, provides, in part: “Whereas, Swain County is home to hundreds of miles of wild fish streams and scores of different streams, ranging from those accessible with a short walk to others that are more remote; and

“Whereas, Swain County holds 52% of the entire acreage of the Great Smoky Mountains National Park and also holds over several hundred miles of trout fishing within the National Park; and

“Whereas, Swain County holds within the Great Smoky Mountains National Park the legendary streams of both Hazel Creek and Deep Creek and the complete length of the Oconaluftee River and its tributaries; and

“Whereas, it is generally acknowledged that for stream-bred fish the streams of the Great Smoky Mountains National Park provide a scenic and wild destination unmatched in the eastern United States; and

“Whereas, virtually all of Swain County’s wild fish waters are available to the general public due to being located in the Nantahala National Forest or the Great Smoky Mountains National Park; and

“Whereas, the lower end of the Nantahala River and the Nantahala Gorge are entirely in Swain County and enjoy the rare attribute of being wadeable during times of power generation as well as when upstream dam gates are shut and also enjoy year-round levels of water; and

“Whereas, the tailwaters of the Nantahala River and the Nantahala Gorge are entirely in Swain County and hold a substantial population of wild fish, even though the river carries a “hatchery supported” designation; and

“Whereas, the tailwaters of the Nantahala River and the Nantahala Gorge are entirely in Swain County and were named in Trout Unlimited’s list of America’s 100 greatest trout streams; and

“Whereas, the tribal waters of the Cherokee Reservation’s famed fishing are in Swain County and offer both catch-and-release trophy options as well as catch-and-keep fishing; and

“Whereas, Swain County offers over two miles of delayed harvest waters on the Tuckasegee River readily accessible via wading, bank fishing, boating, and fishing piers; and

“Whereas, Swain County has hosted two top fly fishing events, the 2011 U.S. National Fly Fishing Championship and the 2012 U.S. Youth National Fly Fishing Championship, and is hosting the upcoming 2017 U.S. Youth National Fly Fishing Championship; and

“Whereas, Swain County has 42,550 stocked trout over 31.2 miles of stream, or 1,364 trout per mile; and

“Whereas, Swain County holds two State record fish; the brook trout State record was caught on Ravens Fork and the brown trout State record was caught on the Nantahala River; and

“Whereas, Swain County is comprised of 541 square miles with 13 square miles of water that equal 2.3% of the county overall with the vast majority of those streams being accessible to fishing; and

“Whereas, Swain County holds four rivers, including the Nantahala, Tuckasegee, Little Tennessee, and Oconaluftee, all easily accessible for fishing and stocked; and

“Whereas, Swain County is home to Fontana Lake, with over 900 miles of shoreline and over 13 varieties of fish, including brown and rainbow trout, small- and large-mouth bass, muskie, walleye, yellow perch, and others; and

“Whereas, Swain County is home to Cheoah Lake, which has over six varieties of fish; and

“Whereas, the fishing industry brings a $174 million economic impact to Western North Carolina; and

“Whereas, Swain County offers a remarkable variety of aquatic waters for outdoor recreation, including fishing, boating, kayaking, and more, which encourages destination tourism, second-home buyers, and retirees to the fair State of North Carolina; and

“Whereas, Swain County is the home of the Fly Fishing Museum of the Southern Appalachians, which is devoted to the history and teaching of the art of fly fishing and nationally recognized as being the top museum of its type; and

“Whereas, Montgomery County and the Uwharrie National Park are located within a two-hour or less drive of 7.6 million people, providing a central location for outdoor events; and

“Whereas, Army Special Forces from Fort Bragg train in off-road maneuvers at the Uwharrie National Forest; and

“Whereas, Montgomery County is the location of the North Carolina Outdoor Festival, an annual fall festival that promotes the natural wonders of the Uwharrie National Forest and the enhanced and sustainable use of the lakes, trails, streams, and the mountains of Montgomery County and the surrounding region; and

“Whereas, the 2018 North Carolina Outdoor Festival will be held over 10 days and is being promoted as the ‘10 Days of Uwharrie;’ and

“Whereas, visitors of the North Carolina Outdoor Festival can enjoy many outdoor activities that include paddling, disc golf, boating, rock hounding, camping, orienteering, horseback riding, a 40-mile supported hike of the Uwharrie trails, a 100-mile trail run known as Uwharrie 100, and various competitions such as mountain biking, kayaking, and fishing; and

“Whereas, the North Carolina Outdoor Festival also provides musical acts, arts and crafts, antiques, food trucks, pottery demonstrations, vendors, and various children’s events, such as scavenger hunts, games, and face painting; and

“Whereas, there will also be an expo for State manufacturers to showcase their outdoor recreational products; and

“Whereas, the North Carolina Outdoor Festival is a family friendly event and is expected to have an attendance of over 30,000 people from all over the country; and

“Whereas, the North Carolina Outdoor Festival should be adopted as the official outdoor festival of the State of North Carolina; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-50.
North Carolina Outdoor Festival.

The North Carolina Outdoor Festival held in Montgomery County is adopted as the official outdoor festival of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2018-11, s. 2.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2018-11, s. 3, made this section effective June 15, 2018.

Session Laws 2018-11, in its preamble, provides, in part: “Whereas, Montgomery County and the Uwharrie National Park are located within a two-hour or less drive of 7.6 million people, providing a central location for outdoor events; and

“Whereas, Army Special Forces from Fort Bragg train in off-road maneuvers at the Uwharrie National Forest; and

“Whereas, Montgomery County is the location of the North Carolina Outdoor Festival, an annual fall festival that promotes the natural wonders of the Uwharrie National Forest and the enhanced and sustainable use of the lakes, trails, streams, and the mountains of Montgomery County and the surrounding region; and

“Whereas, the 2018 North Carolina Outdoor Festival will be held over 10 days and is being promoted as the “10 Days of Uwharrie;” and

“Whereas, visitors of the North Carolina Outdoor Festival can enjoy many outdoor activities that include paddling, disc golf, boating, rock hounding, camping, orienteering, horseback riding, a 40-mile supported hike of the Uwharrie trails, a 100-mile trail run known as Uwharrie 100, and various competitions such as mountain biking, kayaking, and fishing; and

“Whereas, the North Carolina Outdoor Festival also provides musical acts, arts and crafts, antiques, food trucks, pottery demonstrations, vendors, and various children’s events, such as scavenger hunts, games, and face painting; and

“Whereas, there will also be an expo for State manufacturers to showcase their outdoor recreational products; and

“Whereas, the North Carolina Outdoor Festival is a family friendly event and is expected to have an attendance of over 30,000 people from all over the country; and

“Whereas, the North Carolina Outdoor Festival should be adopted as the official outdoor festival of the State of North Carolina; Now, therefore,”

§ 145-51.
State Woolly Worm Festival.

The Woolly Worm Festival, held the third weekend of October of every year in the Town of Banner Elk in Avery County, is adopted as the official Woolly Worm Festival of the State of North Carolina.

History.

2018-89, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2018-89, s. 1, enacted this section as

G.S. 145-50

. It was redesignated as

G.S. 145-51

at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2018-89, s. 2, made this section effective June 25, 2018.

Session 2018-89, in its preamble, provides: “Whereas, since 1978, an annual Woolly Worm Festival has been held in the Town of Banner Elk, which is located in Avery County; and

“Whereas, each year the Woolly Worm Festival welcomes 20,000 people to the community to make family memories; and

“Whereas, in 2007, the Woolly Worm Festival was named one of the top 10 fall festivals in North America by the Society of American Travel Writers; and

“Whereas, in the 40 years of the Woolly Worm Festival, more than $1,400,000 has been raised to make life better for the children of Avery County; and

“Whereas, the winning woolly worm will predict the upcoming winter weather. The 13 segments of the woolly worm are the best predictors of the weather for the 13 weeks of winter; and

“Whereas, establishing the Official Woolly Worm Festival in Banner Elk will serve as a great marketing and promotional tool for Banner Elk and Avery County; Now, therefore,”